Utah statutes.
9-7-403.   Library board terms -- Officers -- Removal -- Vacancies.

(1)  Each director shall be appointed for a three-year term, or until the successor to that director is appointed.  Initially, appointments shall be made for one-, two-, and three-year terms.  Annually thereafter, the city governing body shall, before the first day of July of each year, appoint for a three-year term directors to take the place of the retiring directors.

(2)  Directors shall serve not more than two consecutive full terms.

(3)  The directors shall annually select a chairman and other officers.

(4)  The city governing body may remove any director for misconduct or neglect of duty.

(5)  Vacancies in the board of directors shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments.



Amended by Chapter 10, 1997 General Session

